Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.394

Underground storage tank program—Repeal.

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2030:

(1) RCW 70A.355.005 and 2007 c 147 s 1 & 1989 c 346 s 1;

(2) RCW 70A.355.010 and 2013 c 144 s 53, 2011 c 298 s 39, 2007 c 147 s 2, 1998 c 155 s 1, & 1989 c 346 s 2;

(3) RCW 70A.355.020 and 2013 c 144 s 54, 2011 c 298 s 40, 2007 c 147 s 3, 1998 c 155 s 2, & 1989 c 346 s 3;

(4) RCW 70A.355.030 and 1998 c 155 s 3 & 1989 c 346 s 5;

(5) RCW 70A.355.040 and 2007 c 147 s 4, 1998 c 155 s 4, & 1989 c 346 s 6;

(6) RCW 70A.355.050 and 1998 c 155 s 5 & 1989 c 346 s 7;

(7) RCW 70A.355.060 and 2007 c 147 s 5 & 1989 c 346 s 8;

(8) RCW 70A.355.070 and 2007 c 147 s 6, 1995 c 403 s 639, & 1989 c 346 s 9;

(9) RCW 70A.355.080 and 2007 c 147 s 7, 1998 c 155 s 6, & 1989 c 346 s 10;

(10) RCW 70A.355.090 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 72 & 1989 c 346 s 11;

(11) RCW 70A.355.100 and 2007 c 147 s 8, 1991 c 83 s 1, & 1989 c 346 s 12;

(12) RCW 70A.355.900 and 1989 c 346 s 15;

(13) RCW 70A.355.901 and 1989 c 346 s 14; and

(14) RCW 70A.355.902 and 1989 c 346 s 18.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1051; 2018 c 194 s 2; 2007 c 147 s 11; 1998 c 155 s 8.]